Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5921XS (1) 91 as/js S.F. 2097 Section 1. Section 27A.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 27A.2 Law enforcement agency duties ââ immigration detainer 3 requests. 4 1. All law enforcement agencies and officers in the state 5 shall cooperate and work with United States immigration and 6 customs enforcement and any other federal immigration-related 7 agencies when requested. 8 2. A law enforcement agency in this state that has custody 9 of a person subject to an immigration detainer request issued 10 by United States immigration and customs enforcement shall 11 fully comply with any instruction made in the detainer request 12 and in any other legal document provided by a federal agency. 13